Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1062.
do enact as follows:SB1062,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB1062,27Section 2. 20.155 (3) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB1062,2,9820.155 (3) (b) Broadband line extension grants. The amounts in the schedule 9for financial assistance grants for broadband line extension under s. 196.504 (2r).SB1062,310Section 3. 20.155 (3) (r) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1062,2,151120.155 (3) (r) Broadband expansion grants; transfers. From the universal 12service fund, all moneys transferred under s. 196.218 (3) (a) 2s. a., 2015 Wisconsin 13Act 55, section 9236 (1v), 2017 Wisconsin Act 59, section 9237 (1) and (2) (a), and 142019 Wisconsin Act 9, section 9201 (1), for broadband expansion grants under s. 15196.504 (2).SB1062,416Section 4. 20.155 (3) (rm) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1062,2,191720.155 (3) (rm) Broadband grants; other funding. From the universal service 18fund, as a continuing appropriation, all moneys transferred under s. 196.218 (3) (a) 192s. b., for broadband expansion grants under s. 196.504 (2).SB1062,520Section 5. 196.504 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1062,2,2221196.504 (title) Broadband expansion and line extension grant 22program programs; Broadband Forward! community certification.SB1062,623Section 6. 196.504 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1062,3,424196.504 (2) (a) To make broadband expansion grants to eligible applicants for 1the purpose of constructing broadband infrastructure in unserved areas designated 2under par. (e). Grants awarded under this section subsection shall be paid from the 3appropriations under ss. 20.155 (3) (r) and (rm) and 20.866 (2) (z), in the amount 4allocated under s. 20.866 (2) (z) 5.SB1062,75Section 7. 196.504 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1062,3,106196.504 (2) (b) To prescribe the form, nature, and extent of the information 7that shall be contained in an application for a grant under this section subsection. 8The application shall require the applicant to identify the area of the state that will 9be affected by the proposed project and explain how the proposed project will 10increase broadband access.SB1062,811Section 8. 196.504 (2) (c) 1. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1062,3,1812196.504 (2) (c) 1. (intro.) To establish criteria for evaluating applications and 13awarding grants under this section subsection, which shall require applicants to 14participate in the federal communications commission’s affordable connectivity 15program or any federally mandated successor program. The criteria shall prohibit 16grants that have the effect of subsidizing the expenses of a provider of 17telecommunications service, as defined in s. 182.017 (1g) (cq), or the monthly bills of 18customers of those providers. The criteria shall give priority to all of the following:SB1062,919Section 9. 196.504 (2) (c) 2. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1062,3,2120196.504 (2) (c) 2. (intro.) When evaluating grant applications under this 21section subsection, the commission shall consider all of the following:SB1062,1022Section 10. 196.504 (2r) of the statutes is created to read:SB1062,3,2423196.504 (2r) The commission shall administer the line extension assistance 24program and shall have the following powers:SB1062,4,61(a) To make financial assistance grants to residents of properties that are not 2served by a broadband service provider to assist in paying the customer costs 3associated with line extension necessary to connect broadband service to the 4properties. The amount of a financial assistance grant under this subsection may 5not exceed $4,000. Grants awarded under this subsection shall be paid from the 6appropriation under s. 20.155 (3) (b).SB1062,4,97(b) To establish criteria for evaluating applications and awarding financial 8assistance grants under this subsection. The criteria shall give priority to 9properties that serve as a primary residence.SB1062,4,1010